North Dakota statutes. TITLE 60 Warehousing and Deposits
CHAPTER 60-02 Grain and Seed Warehouses
60-02-25.
Bailment not a sale.

Whenever any grain shall be delivered to any public warehouse and an unconverted scale ticket or a warehouse receipt is issued therefor, such delivery shall be a bailment and not a sale of the grain so delivered. In no case shall the grain so delivered be liable to seizure upon process of any court in any action against such bailee, except in an action by an owner of such unconverted scale ticket or warehouse receipt to enforce the terms thereof or obtain redelivery of such delivered grain. In the event of the failure or insolvency of the warehouseman, all the grain in the warehouse, whether the same is stored or not, first shall be applied at all times to the satisfaction of receipts issued by the warehouseman.

Source:

S.L. 1891, ch. 126, § 8; R.C. 1895, § 1792; R.C. 1899, § 1792; R.C. 1905, § 2250; C.L. 1913, § 3114; S.L. 1925, ch. 216, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 3114; S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 28; R.C. 1943, § 60-0225; S.L. 1983, ch. 672, § 15; 1985, ch. 661, § 9.

60-02-25.1.
Receiptholder’s lien.

Grain contained in a warehouse, including grain owned by the warehouseman, is subject to a first priority lien in favor of outstanding receiptholders storing, selling, or depositing grain in the warehouse. The lien created under this section shall be preferred to any lien or security interest in favor of any creditor of the warehouseman regardless of the time when the creditor’s lien or security interest attached to the grain. Notice of the lien created under this section need not be filed in order to perfect the lien. The lien created by this section is discharged as to grain sold by the warehouseman to a buyer in the ordinary course of business. Such sale does not discharge the lien in favor of an individual receiptholder in the remaining grain in the warehouse.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 661, § 10.

Cross-References.

Word defined by statute always has same meaning, see N.D.C.C. § 1-01-09.

60-02-26.
Standard weights to be used — Exception.

No person purchasing, selling, or storing grain in any public warehouse in this state shall use any measure for such grain other than the standard bushel, and no number of pounds shall be used or called a bushel other than the number of pounds provided by law as the standard weight of the kind of grain in question, except that during the months of October and November, not exceeding eighty-two pounds [37.19 kilograms], and during the months of December and January, not exceeding seventy-six pounds [34.47 kilograms], may be used as the standard weight per bushel of new ear corn.

Source:

S.L. 1909, ch. 211, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 3014; S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 17; R.C. 1943, § 60-0226.

Cross-References.

Standard weight of bushel, see N.D.C.C. § 64-01-05.

60-02-27.
Federal grades to control — Grades to be posted.

All public warehousemen shall purchase and store grain except dry edible beans in accordance with the official grades established from time to time by the secretary of agriculture of the United States, except as otherwise provided in rules and regulations applicable thereto adopted by federal officials pursuant to law. Public warehousemen shall post in a conspicuous place in the public warehousemen’s warehouse the official grades so established and also any change that may be made from time to time. Warehousemen of dry edible beans shall purchase, store, and deliver beans in accordance with the policy of the warehousemen which must be filed with the commissioner and posted in a conspicuous place in the warehouse of the public warehousemen. Other grading standards may be used if mutually agreed to in writing by the warehouseman and the owner of the grain. However, the owner may demand the use of federal grading standards. The commissioner, after hearing, may prohibit the use of nonfederal grades.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 14; R.C. 1943, § 60-0227; S.L. 1991, ch. 696, § 3; 1999, ch. 533, § 6; 2019, ch. 34, § 28, effective July 1, 2019.

60-02-28.
Grading of grain.

All public warehousemen before testing for grade any grain handled by them shall remove therefrom and make due allowance for any dockage of such grain made by reason of the presence of straw, weed seeds, dirt, or any other foreign matter.

Source:

S.L. 1909, ch. 211, § 1; 1913, ch. 176, § 1; C.L. 1913, §§ 3014, 3105; S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 15; R.C. 1943, § 60-0228.

60-02-29.
Allowance for dockage — Penalty for violation.

Any public warehouseman within this state, who shall violate the provisions of section 60-02-28, shall be guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1909, ch. 211, § 2; 1913, ch. 176, § 2; C.L. 1913, §§ 3015, 3106; S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 16; R.C. 1943, § 60-0229; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 628.

60-02-30.
Termination of public grain warehouse storage contracts — Notice to receiptholder.

All storage contracts terminate on the date identified in the publication required by section 60-02-17. If a different termination date is not identified in the publication, then all storage contracts on grain in a public grain warehouse terminate on June thirtieth of each year, except for storage contracts on dry edible beans which terminate on April thirtieth of each year.

Storage on grain in a public grain warehouse may be terminated by the receiptholder at any time before the applicable date by the payment of all legal charges and the surrender of the warehouse receipt, together with a demand for delivery of the grain in storage, or notice to the public warehouseman to sell the stored grain.

Upon the expiration of the storage contract, the warehouseman is not obligated to renew the storage contract.

At least thirty days before the termination date of a storage contract, the public warehouseman shall notify the receiptholder by mail of the warehouseman’s intention to terminate the storage contract on the date identified in the storage contract, unless the receiptholder, before that time, demands redelivery, authorizes sale, extends the storage contract, or enters a new contract with the public warehouseman for restorage. Failure to notify the receiptholder, as required by this section, results in the forfeiture of storage charges accrued for the grain during the previous twelve months.

In the absence of a demand for delivery, an order to sell, or an agreement between the public warehouseman and the receiptholder for storage after the termination date of the storage contract, the warehouseman, upon the expiration of the storage contract, may sell at the local market price on the close of business on that day, all stored grain of the receiptholder and tender to the receiptholder the proceeds of the sale, less accrued storage charges and the public warehouseman’s advances upon any previous storage contract of the receiptholder.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 228, § 1; 1933, ch. 5, § 1, par. 1; R.C. 1943, § 60-0230; S.L. 1977, ch. 565, § 3; 1983, ch. 672, § 16; 1989, ch. 742, § 1; 2005, ch. 587, § 5; 2007, ch. 550, § 1.

60-02-31.
Notice to owner of termination of storage contract. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 550, § 2.

60-02-31.1.
Delivery of dry edible beans to warehouse receiptholder. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 696, § 6.

60-02-32.
Reissue warehouse receipts — Provisions.

Upon payment of all legal accrued charges and the surrender to the warehouseman of a receipt, if the receiptholder and the warehouseman agree to continue the storage contract, the warehouseman then may extend the storage contract or issue a new warehouse receipt to the owner and cancel the former receipt by endorsing thereon the words: “Canceled by the issuance of warehouse receipt no. _________ ”, inserting the number of the reissue warehouse receipt thereafter, and the holder’s name shall be signed thereto by the holder or by the holder’s authorized agent. The reissue warehouse receipt shall be so designated by stamping thereon: “Reissue of warehouse receipt no. _________ ”.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 228, § 2; 1933, ch. 5, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 60-0232; S.L. 1977, ch. 565, § 5; 1983, ch. 672, § 18; 2005, ch. 587, § 7.

60-02-33.
Delivery of grain — Demand terminates storage charge.

On the return and surrender of any receipt and the payment of all lawful charges, the grain represented therein shall be deliverable to the owner and shall not be subject to any further charge for storage after demand for delivery shall have been made and proper facilities for receiving or shipping the same have been provided. The owner of the receipt shall order the receptacle in which the grain covered by the owner’s receipt is to be transported, and the grain shall be delivered when the receptacle so ordered is in proper condition for loading and is placed at the warehouse. The licensee may not assess receiving or redelivery fees on the grain that is redelivered during a suspension, following a revocation, or when the owner of the grain is taking redelivery because the licensee is unable to pay for the grain.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 26; R.C. 1943, § 60-0233; 2003, ch. 547, § 3.

60-02-34.
Refusal to deliver grain — Larceny. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

60-02-35.
Grain to be kept insured for benefit of owner by warehouseman.

A public warehouseman license is not effective unless all grain in storage or on deposit in the warehouse is kept fully insured at the expense of the warehouseman for the benefit of the owner at the current market value of the grain against loss by fire, lightning, internal explosion, windstorm, cyclone, tornado, and such other risks of direct physical loss as provided by the insurer in a policy approved by the insurance commissioner. An insurance policy covering grain in a public warehouse may not be transferred or assigned to any person for any purpose, except for grain that is not on warehouse receipt or deposit. The insurance policy must be continuous and may only be canceled in accordance with section 60-02-35.1.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 29; R.C. 1943, § 60-0235; S.L. 1975, ch. 567, § 1; 1983, ch. 672, § 19; 1989, ch. 741, § 5; 2017, ch. 417, § 3, effective August 1, 2017.

60-02-35.1.
Insurance — Cancellation — Suspension of license.

An insurance company shall give at least sixty days’ notice to the commissioner and the insured by certified mail return receipt requested before cancellation of an insurance policy required in section 60-02-35. Unless the warehouseman files proof of new or renewed insurance at least thirty days before the existing policy ceases, the commissioner, without hearing, shall immediately suspend the warehouseman’s license and the suspension may not be removed until a new policy has been filed and approved by the commissioner. If a license is so suspended, the warehouseman shall give notice of the suspension to each receiptholder having grain stored in the warehouse. The warehouseman shall further notify each receiptholder having grain stored in the warehouse the grain must be removed from the warehouse or the grain will be priced and redeemed in cash in accordance with section 60-02-41.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 672, § 20; 1985, ch. 317, § 82; 1989, ch. 741, § 6; 1991, ch. 696, § 4; 2019, ch. 34, § 29, effective July 1, 2019.

60-02-36.
Destruction of grain in public warehouse — First lien by holder of outstanding receipt.

The holder of an unconverted scale ticket or warehouse receipt issued by any public warehouseman shall have a first lien, to the extent of the value of the grain at the time of loss at the place where held, on all insurance of the warehouse for any loss sustained by the receiptholder, on account of the loss of such grain by fire, tornado, or any other cause covered by such insurance policy.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 29; R.C. 1943, § 60-0236; S.L. 1983, ch. 672, § 21.

60-02-37.
Destruction of warehouse — Duty to notify commission. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 587, § 9.

60-02-38.
Refund of license fee by commissioner.

If requested in writing, the commissioner shall refund the license fee of a public warehouse, or so much as in the commissioner’s judgment is just and reasonable, if satisfactory proof is furnished the warehouse has been transferred to some other person, and the new owner has obtained a license for the same warehouse for the unexpired period for which the original license was issued. If a warehouse is destroyed by fire or other cause, the license fee may be prorated as the commissioner may determine.

Source:

S.L. 1911, ch. 244, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 3110; S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 32; R.C. 1943, § 60-0238; S.L. 1993, ch. 586, § 2; 2017, ch. 417, § 4, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 34, § 30, effective August 1, 2019.

60-02-39.
Warehouse not to be closed without permission from commission — Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 30; R.C. 1943, § 60-0239; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 629; 1983, ch. 672, § 22; repealed by 2017, ch. 417, § 19, effective August 1, 2017.

60-02-40.
Transfer of warehouse — Redemption of receipts.

If a public warehouseman desires to transfer a warehouse, either by sale or lease to any other individual, firm, or corporation, the warehouseman shall:

Notify the commissioner first of the warehouseman’s intention to transfer the warehouse, giving the name and address of the proposed lessee or purchaser.

Furnish a statement of all proper claims that may be filed or pending against the warehouseman pertaining to the storage, inspection, and marketing of grain, together with a statement of:

The number of bushels [cubic meters] of grain of each kind and grade in store in the warehouse;

The number and amount of receipts outstanding; and

The names and addresses of the receiptholders.

Serve notice by registered or certified mail, at least thirty days before the transfer, upon all receiptholders having claims against the warehouse to call for delivery of the grain covered by the receipts, and to pay all storage charges due, the warehouseman in such case to make no charge for redelivery. The commissioner may waive the thirty-day notice period upon receipt of written consent of all receiptholders.

Transfer all stored grain undelivered at the expiration of such thirty-day period to the warehouseman’s successor, if licensed, or to the nearest licensed warehouse for restorage, taking receipts for the same in favor of the owner of the grain so transferred.

Surrender to the commissioner the warehouseman’s license for cancellation, at which time the proposed lessee or purchaser shall file in due form for a new license and tender a new bond for review by the commissioner, at which time, the commissioner, first being duly satisfied all the outstanding receipts have been redeemed, or that the redemption of all outstanding receipts has been provided for, the commissioner may permit a new license to become effective for the lessee or purchaser.

No sale, lease, or transfer of any warehouse will be recognized by the commissioner except when made in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 31; 1931, ch. 226, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 60-0240; S.L. 1983, ch. 672, § 23; 1985, ch. 661, § 12; 1993, ch. 586, § 3; 2005, ch. 587, § 8; 2017, ch. 417, § 5, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 34, § 31, effective July 1, 2019.

60-02-41.
Going out of business — Redemption of receipts.

If a public warehouseman ceases business through the destruction of a warehouse by fire or other cause, or through insolvency, the warehouseman shall redeem all outstanding unconverted scale tickets or warehouse receipts at the price prevailing on the date the warehouse was destroyed or closed because of insolvency. The holder of such receipts, upon due notice, shall accept this price and surrender the receipts. Any public warehouseman who voluntarily ceases business or fails to renew an existing warehouse license or whose warehouse license is revoked shall notify the commissioner and all outstanding receiptholders of such closing and redeem all outstanding unconverted scale tickets or warehouse receipts at the price prevailing on the date the warehouse closed or at the option of the owner of the receipt redeliver the kind, grade, and quantity of grain called for by the unconverted scale ticket or warehouse receipt. On commingled grain the value of over and under deliveries in quantity, grade, and protein must be settled in cash and priced on the market on the day of closing.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 34; R.C. 1943, § 60-0241; S.L. 1979, ch. 632, § 1; 1983, ch. 672, § 24; 1985, ch. 661, § 13; 2019, ch. 34, § 32, effective July 1, 2019.

60-02-42.
Cease and desist.

If an entity engages in an activity or practice contrary to the provisions of this chapter or related rules, the commissioner, upon the commissioner’s own motion without complaint, with or without hearing, may order the entity to cease and desist from the activity until further order of the commissioner. Such orders may include any corrective action up to and including license suspensions. Cease and desist orders must be accompanied by a notice of opportunity to be heard on the order within fifteen days of the issuance of the order.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 557, § 2; 2019, ch. 34, § 33, effective July 1, 2019.

60-02-43.
Agricultural contracts — Mediation or arbitration.

If a written contract for the sale of grain does not contain provisions to settle disagreements concerning factors not governed by section 60-02-05, the parties shall attempt to resolve the disagreements through mediation or arbitration.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 558, § 1.

60-02-44.
Licensed warehouse capacity and condominium storage.

Unless an entire warehouse facility is used for nonpublic purposes, all physically connected portions of the facility must be licensed in accordance with this chapter. The warehouseman shall issue receipt memoranda for all grain received. Facilities that are physically connected to the licensed warehouse may be sold under a condominium arrangement or leased to other entities for nonpublic use and sales and lease agreements must be based on the capacity of the bins involved and not on the number of bushels held in the space. The licensee shall provide contents insurance and bond coverage for the space. In case of licensee insolvency, the contents of the space must be considered an asset to the trust fund established under chapter 60-04 and owners and lessees are entitled to trust fund protection in a manner equal to all other valid grain receiptholders.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 547, § 4.